West Virginia, session 2025, SB744.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3A. CENTRAL NONPROFIT COORDINATING AGENCY AND COMMITTEE FOR THE PURCHASE OF COMMODITIES AND SERVICES FROM THE HANDICAPPED. §1. Repeal of article creating the Central Nonprofit Coordinating Agency and Committee for the Purchase of Commodities and Services from the Handicapped. That §5A-3A-1, §5A-3A-2, §5A-3A-3, §5A-3A-4, §5A-3A-5, and §5A-3A-6 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed.